Washington statutes.
RCW 19.110.140

Director authorized to investigate violations—Authority to subpoena witnesses or require production of documents.

The director may make public or private investigations within or outside the state of Washington to determine whether any person has violated or is about to violate any provision of this chapter or any rule or order issued under this chapter. The director, or any officer designated by the director, may administer oaths and affirmations, subpoena witnesses and compel their attendance, take evidence, and require the production of any books, papers, correspondence, memoranda, agreements, or other documents or records which the director deems relevant to the inquiry.

If any person fails to comply with a lawful subpoena, or refuses to testify under lawful interrogation, or refuses to produce documents and records, the director may apply to the superior court of any county for relief. After satisfactory evidence of wilful disobedience, the court may compel obedience by proceedings for contempt.

[ 1981 c 155 s 14.]